Wisconsin, session 2025, AB510.
do enact as follows:AB510,13Section 1. 944.30 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB510,2,44944.30 (3) (a) If a person summons and makes contact with a law enforcement 5officer, ambulance, emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 6(5), or other health care provider, in order to report any crime other than 1prostitution or to seek medical care, any statements or other evidence relating to 2the crime of prostitution that are obtained as a result of the person seeking the 3medical care or making the criminal report may not be used in the prosecution of 4the person for prostitution or attempted prostitution under this section.AB510,2,125(b) If a person summons and makes contact with a law enforcement officer, 6ambulance, emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 (5), or 7other health care provider, in order to report any crime other than prostitution or to 8seek medical care on behalf of another person, any statements or other evidence 9relating to the crime of prostitution that are obtained as a result of the person 10seeking the medical care or making the criminal report may not be used in the 11prosecution of the other person for prostitution or attempted prostitution under this 12section.AB510,2,1313